Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-3702
Act;
purposes.

The purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development
Act are (1) to create a commission
and a fund to provide general promotional activity,
solicitation, and an operating program to attract visitors to Nebraska and
further the use of travel and tourism facilities in Nebraska, (2) to provide
for a lodging tax on hotels for the purpose of establishing a State Visitors
Promotion Cash Fund, and (3) to authorize the governing body of any county
to appoint a visitors committee and impose a lodging tax on hotels for the
purpose of establishing a County Visitors Promotion Fund and a County Visitors
Improvement Fund.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 262, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 726, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1245;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 2.